Utah statutes.
78B-6-106.   Responsibility of each party for own actions -- Fraud or misrepresentation.

(1)  Each parent of a child conceived or born outside of marriage is responsible for his or her own actions and is not excused from strict compliance with the provisions of this  chapter based upon any action, statement, or omission of the other parent or third parties.

(2)  Any person injured by fraudulent representations or actions in connection with an adoption is entitled to pursue civil or criminal penalties in accordance with existing law.  A fraudulent representation is not a defense to strict compliance with the requirements of this chapter, and is not a basis for dismissal of a petition for adoption, vacation of an adoption decree, or an automatic grant of custody to the offended party.  Custody determinations shall be based on the best interest of the child, in accordance with the provisions of Section 78B-6-133.

